Maryland, session 2025, SB0617.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Occupations and Professions
5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(i) (1) “License” means, unless the context requires otherwise, a license issued
by the Board.
(2) “License” includes, unless the context requires otherwise, each of the
following licenses:
– 1 –

Ch. 354 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) a license to practice cosmetology;
(ii) a license to practice as a senior cosmetologist;
(iii) a limited license to provide esthetic services;
(iv) a limited license to provide hair services;
(v) a limited license to provide hair services – blow drying; [and]
(vi) a limited license to provide nail technician services; AND
(VII) A LIMITED LICENSE TO PROVIDE EYELASH EXTENSION
SERVICES.
(l) (1) “Limited license” means a license issued by the Board to practice
cosmetology as limited in § 5–301 of this title.
(2) “Limited license” includes, unless the context requires otherwise, each
of the following licenses:
(i) a limited license to provide esthetic services;
(ii) a limited license to provide hair services;
(iii) a limited license to provide hair services – blow drying; [and]
(iv) a limited license to provide nail technician services; AND
(V) A LIMITED LICENSE TO PROVIDE EYELASH EXTENSION
SERVICES.
(n) (1) “Practice cosmetology” means to engage in any of the following for
compensation:
(i) providing hair services;
(ii) arching or dyeing eyebrows;
(iii) dyeing eyelashes;
(iv) providing esthetic services; [or]
(v) providing nail technician services; OR
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 354
(VI) PROVIDING EYELASH EXTENSION SERVICES.
(2) The practice of cosmetology does not include:
(i) the mere sale, fitting, or styling of wigs or hairpieces;
(ii) the mere shampooing of hair; or
(iii) a service that results in tension on hair strands or roots by
twisting, wrapping, weaving, extending, locking, or braiding by hand or mechanical device,
provided that the service does not include the application of dyes, reactive chemicals, or
other preparations to alter the color of the hair or to straighten, curl, or alter the structure
of the hair.
(o) (1) “Provide esthetic services” means to provide to an individual, for
compensation, the service of:
(i) cleansing, exercising, exfoliating, massaging, cosmetic
microneedling, stimulating, toning, or performing any other similar procedure on the skin
or scalp by electrical, mechanical, or any other means;
(ii) applying to the face, body, or scalp an alcohol, cream, lotion,
astringent, or cosmetic preparation; [or]
(iii) removing superfluous hair by the use of electrical, mechanical,
or any means other than by the use of a laser light–based device; OR
(IV) PROVIDING EYELASH EXTENSION SERVICES.
(2) “Provide esthetic services” includes:
(i) applying eyelash extensions;
(ii) performing superficial exfoliation treatments of the epidermis
using professional and other commercially available products or devices;
(iii) performing treatments for the relaxation, hydration, contouring,
and beautification of the face, skin, body, eyelashes, or eyebrows; and
(iv) performing nonablative skin rejuvenation.
(3) “Provide esthetic services” does not include:
(i) the diagnosis of illness, disease, or injury; or
(ii) performing ablation of the dermis or hypodermis.
– 3 –

Ch. 354 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(P) “PROVIDE EYELASH EXTENSION SERVICES” MEANS TO PROVIDE TO AN
INDIVIDUAL, FOR COMPENSATION, THE SERVICE OF:
(1) CLEANING THE EYE AREA;
(2) APPLYING:
(I) EYELASH PRIMERS AND ADHESIVES;
(II) EYELASH EXTENSIONS; AND
(III) SEALANT; OR
(3) DRYING THE EYE AREA FOR EYELASH EXTENSIONS.
[(p)] (Q) “Provide hair services” means to provide to an individual for
compensation the service of beautifying, cleaning, or embellishing the hair of the individual
by:
(1) arranging the hair;
(2) bleaching the hair;
(3) cleansing the hair;
(4) coloring the hair;
(5) curling the hair;
(6) cutting the hair;
(7) dressing the hair;
(8) singeing the hair;
(9) permanent waving the hair;
(10) waving the hair; or
(11) performing any other similar procedure intended to beautify, clean, or
embellish the hair.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 354
[(q)] (R) “Provide hair services – blow drying” means to provide to an individual
for compensation the service of beautifying, cleaning, or arranging the hair of the individual
by:
(1) arranging the hair;
(2) cleansing the hair;
(3) curling the hair;
(4) dressing the hair;
(5) blow drying the hair;
(6) singeing the hair; or
(7) performing any other similar procedure intended to beautify, clean, or
arrange the hair.
[(r)] (S) “Provide nail technician services” means to provide to an individual, for
compensation, the service of:
(1) manicuring or pedicuring the individual’s nails;
(2) applying artificial nail enhancement products; or
(3) maintaining artificial nail enhancement products.
5–205.
(b) (1) The Board shall adopt regulations that establish detailed curriculum
standards for use by the State Board of Education or the Maryland Higher Education
Commission in approving applications for instruction in the practice of cosmetology, the
provision of esthetic services, THE PROVISION OF EYELASH EXTENSION SERVICES, the
provision of hair services, and the provision of nail technician services at public schools or
private career schools.
(2) The curriculum standards established under paragraph (1) of this
subsection shall:
(i) incorporate modern methods and practices for:
1. practicing cosmetology;
2. providing esthetic services;
– 5 –

Ch. 354 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
3. PROVIDING EYELASH EXTENSION SERVICES;
[3.] 4. providing hair services;
[4.] 5. providing hair services – blow drying; and
[5.] 6. providing nail technician services;
(ii) include a reference to each topic and the emphasis of each topic
required of a comprehensive curriculum in the appropriate licensing area; and
(iii) be reviewed and updated periodically as determined by the
Board.
(c) (1) [Beginning October 1, 2018, the] THE Board shall require a licensee
renewing a license to complete at least six credit hours of continuing education approved
by the Board.
(2) The Board shall adopt regulations that set standards for continuing
education courses that, at a minimum, require:
(i) two hours of training in health, safety, and welfare subjects; and
(ii) four hours of training in general elective courses.
5–301.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title, an individual shall be licensed by
the Board to practice cosmetology before the individual may practice cosmetology in the
State.
(b) If an individual holds the appropriate limited license, the individual may
practice cosmetology in a manner limited to:
(1) providing esthetic services;
(2) PROVIDING EYELASH EXTENSION SERVICES;
[(2)] (3) providing hair services;
[(3)] (4) providing hair services – blow drying; or
[(4)] (5) providing nail technician services.
(c) Subsection (a) of this section does not apply to:
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 354
(1) a student while the student practices cosmetology in accordance with §
5–302 or § 5–303 of this subtitle; or
(2) a registered apprentice.
5–305.
(a) To qualify for a limited license to practice cosmetology, an applicant shall be
an individual who meets the requirements of this section.
(b) An applicant for a limited license to provide esthetic services shall:
(1) be at least 17 years old;
(2) have completed successfully a 9th grade education or the equivalent;
and
(3) have received training by:
(i) serving as a registered apprentice for at least 6 months as
provided under §§ 5–404 and 5–405 of this title; or
(ii) successfully completing at least 600 hours of instruction in
providing esthetic services in a cosmetology school approved by the State Department of
Education or the Maryland Higher Education Commission in consultation with the Board.
(C) AN APPLICANT FOR A LIMITED LICENSE TO PROVIDE EYELASH
EXTENSION SERVICES SHALL:
(1) BE AT LEAST 17 YEARS OLD;
(2) HAVE COMPLETED SUCCESSFULLY A 9TH GRADE EDUCATION OR
THE EQUIVALENT; AND
(3) (I) HAVE RECEIVED TRAINING BY:
1. SERVING AS A REGISTERED APPRENTICE FOR AT
LEAST 3 MONTHS AS PROVIDED UNDER §§ 5–404 AND 5–405 OF THIS TITLE; OR
2. SUCCESSFULLY COMPLETING AT LEAST 100 HOURS
OF INSTRUCTION IN PROVIDING EYELASH EXTENSION SERVICES IN A COSMETOLOGY
SCHOOL APPROVED BY THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION OR THE
MARYLAND HIGHER EDUCATION COMMISSION IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
BOARD; OR
– 7 –

Ch. 354 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) PASS A PRACTICAL AND WRITTEN EXAMINATION
ADMINISTERED BY THE BOARD.
[(c)] (D) An applicant for a limited license to provide hair services shall:
(1) be at least 17 years old;
(2) have completed successfully a 9th grade education or the equivalent;
and
(3) have received training by:
(i) serving as a registered apprentice for at least 15 months as
provided under §§ 5–404 and 5–405 of this title; or
(ii) successfully completing at least 1,200 hours of instruction
providing hair services in a cosmetology school approved by the State Department of
Education or the Maryland Higher Education Commission in consultation with the Board.
[(d)] (E) An applicant for a limited license to provide hair services – blow drying
shall:
(1) be at least 17 years old;
(2) have completed successfully a 9th grade education or the equivalent;
and
(3) have received training by successfully completing at least 350 hours of
instruction providing hair services – blow drying in a cosmetology school approved by the
State Department of Education or the Maryland Higher Education Commission in
consultation with the Board.
[(e)] (F) An applicant for a limited license to provide nail technician services
shall:
(1) be at least 17 years old;
(2) have successfully completed a 9th grade education or the equivalent;
and
(3) have received training by:
(i) serving as a registered apprentice for at least 3 months as
provided under §§ 5–404 and 5–405 of this title; or
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 354
(ii) successfully completing at least 250 hours of instruction in
providing nail technician services in a cosmetology school approved by the State
Department of Education or the Maryland Higher Education Commission in consultation
with the Board.
[(f)] (G) If an applicant is licensed to practice as an esthetician, EYELASH
EXTENSION TECHNICIAN, hairstylist, hairstylist – blow drying technician, or nail
technician in another state or foreign country, the applicant meets the training
requirements of this section if the applicant has held a limited license in the other state or
foreign country and has actively practiced in the other state or foreign country for a period
of 6 months.
[(g)] (H) An applicant for a limited license shall pass an examination given by
the Board under this subtitle.
5–310.
(a) Subject to subsections (b), (c), (d), [and] (e), AND (F) of this section and while
a license to practice cosmetology is in effect, it authorizes the licensee to practice
cosmetology.
(b) While a limited license to provide esthetic services is in effect, it authorizes
the licensee to provide only esthetic services.
(C) WHILE A LIMITED LICENSE TO PROVIDE EYELASH EXTENSION SERVICES
IS IN EFFECT, IT AUTHORIZES THE LICENSEE TO PROVIDE ONLY EYELASH
EXTENSION SERVICES.
[(c)] (D) While a limited license to provide hair services is in effect, the license
authorizes the licensee to provide only hair services.
[(d)] (E) While a limited license to provide hair services – blow drying is in effect,
the license authorizes the licensee to provide only hair services – blow drying.
[(e)] (F) While a limited license to provide nail technician services is in effect, it
authorizes the licensee to provide only nail technician services.
5–404.
(a) While registration as an apprentice is in effect, the registration authorizes the
individual to learn to practice cosmetology or any limited practice of cosmetology:
(1) in a:
(i) beauty salon that holds a beauty salon permit; or
– 9 –

Ch. 354 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) barbershop that holds a barbershop permit; and
(2) under the supervision of:
(i) if learning to practice cosmetology, a licensed senior
cosmetologist;
(ii) if learning to provide esthetic services, a licensed senior
cosmetologist or a licensed esthetician with 2 years’ experience;
(III) IF LEARNING TO PROVIDE EYELASH EXTENSION SERVICES:
1. BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2027, A LICENSED SENIOR
COSMETOLOGIST WHO HAS COMPLETED CONTINUING EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS
IN PROVIDING EYELASH EXTENSION SERVICES; OR
2. A LICENSED EYELASH EXTENSION TECHNICIAN WITH
2 YEARS’ EXPERIENCE;
[(iii)] (IV) if learning to provide hair services, a licensed senior
cosmetologist or a licensed hairstylist with 2 years’ experience; and
[(iv)] (V) if learning to provide nail technician services, a licensed
senior cosmetologist or a licensed nail technician with 2 years’ experience.
(b) A licensed senior cosmetologist may directly train and supervise not more
than two apprentices learning to practice cosmetology or any limited practice of
cosmetology specified in subsection (a)(2) of this section.
(c) An individual with one of the limited licenses specified in subsection (a)(2) of
this section who has at least 2 years of experience in that limited practice of cosmetology
may directly train and supervise not more than two apprentices learning the same limited
practice of cosmetology.
5–501.
(a) A person shall hold a beauty salon permit issued by the Board before the
person may operate a beauty salon in the State.
(b) A beauty salon may operate as a limited practice beauty salon by offering
cosmetology services limited to:
(1) providing esthetic services;
(2) PROVIDING EYELASH EXTENSION SERVICES;
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 354
[(2)] (3) providing hair services;
[(3)] (4) providing hair services – blow drying; or
[(4)] (5) providing nail technician services.
(c) A separate beauty salon permit is required for each beauty salon that a person
operates.
5–605.
(a) Except as provided in §§ 5–302 and 5–303 of this title and subsection (b) of
this section, a person may not practice cosmetology, provide esthetic services, PROVIDE
EYELASH EXTENSION SERVICES, provide hair services, provide hair services – blow
drying, or provide nail technician services in any place other than:
(1) a beauty salon that holds a beauty salon permit; or
(2) a barbershop that holds a barbershop permit issued under Title 4 of this
article.
(b) (1) A licensed cosmetologist, esthetician, EYELASH EXTENSION
TECHNICIAN, hairstylist, hairstylist – blow dry technician, or nail technician may practice
cosmetology and provide services in:
(i) a facility in which beautification–oriented medical services,
authorized by the Maryland Department of Health, are provided;
(ii) the residence of an individual confined to the residence by reason
of a physical or mental infirmity;
(iii) an assisted living facility as defined in § 19–1801 of the Health –
General Article;
(iv) a hospice facility defined in § 19–901(c) of the Health – General
Article;
(v) a nursing home as defined in § 19–1401(e) of the Health –
General Article; or
(vi) a hospital as defined in § 19–301 of the Health – General Article
or a similar institution.
(2) To practice in any of the locations specified in this subsection:
– 11 –

Ch. 354 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) the licensed cosmetologist, esthetician, EYELASH EXTENSION
TECHNICIAN, hairstylist, hairstylist – blow dry technician, or nail technician shall be
sponsored by a beauty salon in which the cosmetologist, esthetician, hairstylist, hairstylist
– blow dry technician, or nail technician is authorized to practice;
(ii) the patron to whom the services are rendered shall be a customer
of the beauty salon; and
(iii) the services shall be rendered by appointment through the
beauty salon.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 12 –